en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Input Devices > Graphics Tablets: Pen Displays; Pen Tablets
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Urządzenia wejściowe > Tablety graficzne: Monitory piórkowe; Tablety piórkowe
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 입력 장치 > 그래픽스 태블릿: 펜 디스플레이; 펜 태블릿
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Dispositivos de entrada > Tablets gráficos: Ecrãs com caneta; Tablets com caneta
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Eingabegeräte > Grafiktabletts: Stift-Displays; Stift-Tablets
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Syöttölaitteet > Piirtopöydät: Kynänäyttö; Piirtotabletti
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Įvesties įrenginiai > Grafinės planšetės: Rašikliniai ekranai; Rašiklinės planšetės
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Ulazni uređaji > Grafički tableti: Zasloni s olovkom; Tablice s olovkom
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Dispozitive de intrare > Tablete grafice: Monitoare grafice cu stylus; Tablete grafice cu stylus
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Thiết bị đầu vào > Bảng vẽ máy tính: Màn hình bút; Bảng bút
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Giriş Aygıtları > Grafik Tabletleri: Kalem Ekranları; Kalem Tabletleri
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Inndataenheter > Grafikknettbrett: Penneskjermer; Pennebrett
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Vstupní zařízení > Grafické tablety: Displeje s perem; Tablety s perem
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 输入设备 > 手写板/绘图板: 数位屏; 数位板
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 輸入裝置 > 數位繪圖板/手寫板: 繪圖螢幕; 繪圖板
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Beviteli eszközök > Grafikus táblagépek: Tollkijelzők; Tolltáblagépek
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Συσκευές εισόδου > Πλακέτες γραφικών: Οθόνες με γραφίδα; Ταμπλέτες με γραφίδα
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Périphériques de saisie > Tablettes graphiques: Écrans à stylet; Tablettes à stylet
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Vstupné zariadenia > Grafické tablety: Perové displeje; Perové tablety
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Naprave za vnos podatkov > Grafične tablice: Peresni zasloni; Peresne tablice
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Dispositivos de entrada > Tabletas gráficas: Pantallas con lápiz; Tabletas digitalizadoras
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Dispositivos de entrada > Mesas gráficas digitalizadoras: Displays com caneta; Tablets com caneta
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Inputenheder > Grafiktablets: Penne-displays; Penne-tablets
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Inmatningsenheter > Grafikplattor: Pennskärmar; Pennplattor
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > 入力デバイス > ペンタブレット: ペンディスプレイ; ペンタブレット
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Invoerapparaten > Grafische tablets: Pen displays; Pen tablets
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Устройства ввода > Графические планшеты: Графические дисплеи с пером; Графические планшеты
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Входни устройства > Графични таблети: Дисплеи с химикал; Таблети с химикал
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > อุปกรณ์ป้อนข้อมูล > กราฟิกส์แท็บเล็ต: จอแสดงผลสำหรับปากกาดิจิทัล; แท็บเล็ตปากกาดิจิทัล
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Dispositivi di input > Tavolette grafiche: Display a penna; Tavolette a penna